Utah statutes.
31A-40-401.   Prohibited acts.

(1)  A person may not:

(a)  offer or provide a professional employer service if the person is not licensed under this chapter;

(b)  use one of the following names if the person is not licensed under this chapter:

(i)  "administrative employer";

(ii)  "employee leasing";

(iii)  "PEO";

(iv)  "professional employer organization";

(v)  "staff leasing"; or

(vi)  other name that represents the provision of a professional employer service;

(c)  knowingly provide false or fraudulent information to the commissioner:

(i)  in conjunction with an application to be licensed or to renew a license under this chapter; or

(ii)  in a report required under this chapter;

(d)  knowingly make a material misrepresentation to the commissioner or other governmental agency;

(e)  fail to make a filing with a state agency that is required by this chapter or the professional employer agreement within 30 days of the day on which the filing is due;

(f)  fail to make a payment to a state agency that is required by this chapter or the professional employer agreement within 30 days of the day on which the payment is due;

(g) (i)  offer a covered employee a self-funded medical plan unless the self-funded medical plan is maintained for the sole benefit of covered employees;

(ii)  misrepresent that a self-funded medical plan it offers is other than self-funded; or

(iii)  offer to a covered employee a self-funded or partially self-funded medical plan without delivering to a plan participant a summary plan description that accurately describes the terms of the plan, including disclosure that the plan is self-funded or partially self-funded;

(h)  subject to Subsection (2), divert to another purpose or use other than as designated funds paid by a client to the professional employer organization and designated for:

(i)  compensation of a covered employee;

(ii)  a benefit of a covered employee;

(iii)  a payroll-related tax;

(iv)  an unemployment insurance contribution;

(v)  withholding of compensation for a covered employee;

(vi)  a workers' compensation premium; or

(vii)  another assessment paid by a professional employer organization to or on behalf of a covered employee under a professional employer agreement;

(i)  provide a covered employee to a client under a provision, term, or condition that is not contained in a professional employer arrangement between the professional employer organization and client;

(j)  engage in a willful, fraudulent, or deceitful act that:

(i)  is by a professional employer organization, caused by a professional employer organization, or at a professional employer organization's direction; and

(ii)  causes material injury to a client or covered employee;

(k)  fail to comply with a federal law or state law, to the extent state law is not preempted by federal law, regarding an employee benefit offered to an employee; or

(l)  willfully or recklessly violate this chapter or an order or rule issued by the commissioner under this chapter.

(2)  If a client defaults on a professional employer agreement or otherwise fails to pay a professional employer organization, the professional employer organization is not in violation of this section if the professional employer organization allocates the deficient payment to the portions of an invoice.

